nl: Fase kippenvoer: Vleeskuiken; Groei; Leg; Scratch; Start; Andere
es: Etapa de alimentación de pollos: Asador; Cultivador; Capa; Rascador; Iniciador; Otros
zh-TW: 雞飼料發展時期: 肉雞; 生長期; 蛋雞; 刮盤; 保育期; 其他
zh-CN: 鸡饲料阶段: 肉鸡; 生长期; 蛋鸡; Scratch; 幼畜; 其他
fr: Étape d’alimentation des poulets: Poulet; Producteur; Couche; Scratch; Démarreur; Autre
lt-LT: Vištų lesalo paskirtis pagal gyvenimo etapą: Broileriams; Penėjimui; Dedeklėms; Grūdų mišinys; Starteris; Kita
ja: 段階別鶏用飼料: ブロイラー; グローワー; レイヤー; スクラッチ; スターター; その他
cs: Fáze krmení kuřat: Brojler; Růstové; Nosnice; Scratch; Startér; Jiné
bg-BG: Етап на хранене на пилета: Бройлер; Подрастващи; Носачки; Фураж; Начална фаза; Други
ru: Тип корма для кур: Бройлер; Молодняк; Несушка; Ясли; Стартер; Другое
sv: Kycklingfoderstadium: Broiler; Tillväxtfoder; Värpfoder; Repa; Startfoder; Övrigt
sl-SI: Primerna faza za krmljenje piščancev: Brojler; 8–16 tednov; Od 16 tednov naprej; Prehransko dopolnilo; 0–8 tednov; Drugo
nb: Kyllingfôrstadium: Slaktekylling; Kraftfôr; Lag; Ripe; Startfôr; Annet
ko: 닭 사료 단계: 육계; 육성; 산란; 스크래치; 자돈; 기타
de: Alter der zu fütternden Hühner: Masthähnchen; Erzeuger; Legehenne; Scratch; Starter; Sonstiges
fi: Kanojen rehukoroke: Broileri; Kasvattaja; Munija; Scratch; Aloittelu; Muu
hr-HR: Razvojna faza hrane za kokoši: Brojler; U rastu; Nesilice; Žitarice; Početni rast; Ostalo
sk-SK: Kŕmne fázy kurčiat: Brojlery; Pestovateľ; Vrstva; Škrabať; Štartér; Iné
da: Kyllingefoderstadie: Slagtekyllinger; Avler; Æglægger; Scratch; Starter; Andet
pt-BR: Estágio de alimentação do frango: Aves para grelhar; Produtor; Fatiar; Artesanal; Inicial; Outro
tr: Tavuk besleme aşaması: Piliç; Büyütücü; Yumurta; Çizik; Yavru; Diğer
vi: Giai đoạn cho gà ăn: Gà giò; Choai; Gà mái đẻ trứng; Chà; Khởi động; Khác
pt-PT: Fase de alimentação de galinhas: Frango broiler; Crescimento; Camada; Scratch; Iniciação; Outro
it: Fase di alimentazione dei polli: Pollo da carne; Grower; Strato; Scratch; Starter; Altro
el: Στάδιο τροφοδοσίας των κοτόπουλων: Κοτοπουλάκι; Απογαλακτισμένο κοτόπουλο; Ωοτόκος πουλάδα; Scratch; Κοτόπουλο στο στάδιο έναρξης του παραγωγικού κύκλου; Άλλο
en: Chicken feed stage: Broiler; Grower; Layer; Scratch; Starter; Other
ro-RO: Stadiu furaj găini: Pui; Etapa de creștere; Etapa de finisare (16-17 săptămâni); Etapa de finisare (18 săptămâni); Etapa de început; Altele
pl: Etap karmienia kurczaków: Brojler; Plantator; Warstwa; Zarys; Przystawka; Inne
hu: Csirketakarmányhoz tartozó életszakasz: Brojler; Nevelő; Tojó; Kapirgáló; Indító; Egyéb
th: ระยะอาหารไก่: ไก่กระทง; ไก่รุ่น; ไก่ไข่; สแครทช์; ไก่เล็ก; อื่นๆ